District of Columbia statutes.
29-708.03

Winding up.

(a)

A limited partnership shall continue after dissolution only for the purpose of winding up its activities and affairs.

(b)

In winding up its activities and affairs, the limited partnership:

(1)

May amend its certificate of limited partnership to state that the limited partnership is dissolved, preserve the limited partnership business or property as a going concern for a reasonable time, prosecute and defend actions and proceedings, whether civil, criminal, or administrative, transfer the limited partnership’s property, settle disputes by mediation or arbitration, file a statement of termination as provided in § 29-702.03, and perform other necessary acts; and

(2)

Shall discharge the limited partnership’s liabilities, settle and close the limited partnership’s activities, and marshal and distribute the assets of the partnership.

(c)

If a dissolved limited partnership does not have a general partner, a person to wind up the dissolved limited partnership’s activities and affairs may be appointed by the consent of limited partners owning a majority of the rights to receive distributions as limited partners at the time the consent is to be effective. A person appointed under this subsection shall:

(1)

Have the powers of a general partner under § 29-708.04; and

(2)

Promptly amend the certificate of limited partnership to state:

(A)

That the limited partnership does not have a general partner;

(B)

The name of the person that has been appointed to wind up the limited partnership; and

(C)

The street and mailing address of the person.

(d)

On the application of any partner, the Superior Court may order judicial supervision of the winding up, including the appointment of a person to wind up the dissolved limited partnership’s activities and affairs, if:

(1)

A limited partnership does not have a general partner and within a reasonable time following the dissolution no person has been appointed pursuant to subsection (c) of this section; or

(2)

The applicant establishes other good cause.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(g)(9)(C), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-701.07, § 29-702.02, § 29-702.03, and § 29-702.04.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “activities and affairs” for “activities” throughout the section.

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 803 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.